en_US.aff
FLAG num
SFX 44 Y 79
SFX 44 0 ති  .
SFX 44 0 ත්වා  .
SFX 44 0 නවා  .
SFX 44 0 නවාලා  .
SFX 44 0 නු  .
SFX 44 0 න්න  .
SFX 44 0 න්නීය  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙමි  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙමිවා  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙමු  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙමුවා  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙහි  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෙහිවා  .
SFX 44 0 න්නේය  .
SFX 44 0 න්නෝය  .
SFX 44 0 පන්  .
SFX 44 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 44 0 මි  .
SFX 44 0 මිවා  .
SFX 44 0 මු  .
SFX 44 0 මුවා  .
SFX 44 0 යි  .
SFX 44 0 ව  .
SFX 44 0 වති  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නීය  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නෙමි  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නෙමු  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නෙහි  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නෙහු  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නේය  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නෝය  .
SFX 44 0 වමි  .
SFX 44 0 වමු  .
SFX 44 0 වයි  .
SFX 44 0 වහි  .
SFX 44 0 වහු  .
SFX 44 0 වු  .
SFX 44 0 හි  .
SFX 44 0 හිවා  .
SFX 44 0 හු  .
SFX 44 0 හුවා  .
SFX 44 0 ාවා  .
SFX 44 0 මින්  .
SFX 44 0 ා  .
SFX 44 0 න්නට  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නට  .
SFX 44 0 නලද  .
SFX 44 0 නුලැබූ  .
SFX 44 0 වමින්  .
SFX 44 0 ද්දී  .
SFX 44 0 නලදී  .
SFX 44 0 ුණු  .
SFX 44 0 ූ  .
SFX 44 0 ුවෙමි  .
SFX 44 0 ුවෙමු  .
SFX 44 0 ුවෙහි  .
SFX 44 0 ුවෙහු  .
SFX 44 0 ුවාය  .
SFX 44 0 ුවේය  .
SFX 44 0 ුවෝය  .
SFX 44 0 ේ  .
SFX 44 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 44 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 44 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 44 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 44 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 44 0 ෙති  .
SFX 44 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 44 0 වෙති  .
SFX 44 0 වේ  .
SFX 44 0 ිය  .
SFX 44 0 ුවොත්  .
SFX 44 0 ුවේ  .
SFX 44 0 න්නේ  .
SFX 44 0 න  .
SFX 44 0 නට  .
SFX 44 0 බලවා  .
SFX 44 0 වන්නේ  .
SFX 44 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 45 Y 75
SFX 45 0 ති  .
SFX 45 0 ත්වා  .
SFX 45 0 නවා  .
SFX 45 0 නවාලා  .
SFX 45 0 නු  .
SFX 45 0 න්න  .
SFX 45 0 න්නීය  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙමි  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙමිවා  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙමු  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙමුවා  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙහි  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෙහිවා  .
SFX 45 0 න්නේය  .
SFX 45 0 න්නෝය  .
SFX 45 0 පන්  .
SFX 45 0 පල්ලා  .
SFX 45 0 මි  .
SFX 45 0 මිවා  .
SFX 45 0 මු  .
SFX 45 0 මුවා  .
SFX 45 0 යි  .
SFX 45 0 ව  .
SFX 45 0 වති  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නීය  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නෙමි  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නෙමු  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නෙහි  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නෙහු  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නේය  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නෝය  .
SFX 45 0 වමි  .
SFX 45 0 වමු  .
SFX 45 0 වයි  .
SFX 45 0 වහි  .
SFX 45 0 වහු  .
SFX 45 0 වු  .
SFX 45 0 හි  .
SFX 45 0 හිවා  .
SFX 45 0 හු  .
SFX 45 0 හුවා  .
SFX 45 0 ාවා  .
SFX 45 0 මින්  .
SFX 45 0 ා  .
SFX 45 0 න්නට  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නට  .
SFX 45 0 නලද  .
SFX 45 0 නුලැබූ  .
SFX 45 0 වමින්  .
SFX 45 0 ද්දී  .
SFX 45 0 නලදී  .
SFX 45 0 ුණු  .
SFX 45 0 ූ  .
SFX 45 0 ෙමි  .
SFX 45 0 ෙමු  .
SFX 45 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 45 0 ෙහු  .
SFX 45 0 ාය  .
SFX 45 0 ේය  .
SFX 45 0 ෝය  .
SFX 45 0 ේ  .
SFX 45 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 45 0 ෙති  .
SFX 45 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 45 0 වෙති  .
SFX 45 0 වේ  .
SFX 45 0 ිය  .
SFX 45 0 ුවොත්  .
SFX 45 0 ුවේ  .
SFX 45 0 න  .
SFX 45 0 න්නේ  .
SFX 45 0 නට  .
SFX 45 0 වා  .
SFX 45 0 වන්නේ  .
SFX 45 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 46 Y 56	
SFX 46 0 ති  .	
SFX 46 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 46 0 නවා  .	
SFX 46 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 46 0 නු  .	
SFX 46 0 න්න  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 46 ි පන්  .	
SFX 46 ි පල්ලා  .	
SFX 46 0 මි  .	
SFX 46 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 46 0 මු  .	
SFX 46 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 46 0 යි  .	
SFX 46 ි ව  .	
SFX 46 0 වු  .	
SFX 46 0 හි  .	
SFX 46 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 46 0 හු  .	
SFX 46 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 46 ි ීවා  .	
SFX 46 0 මින්  .	
SFX 46 0 ද  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 46 ි වන්නට  .	
SFX 46 0 නලද  .	
SFX 46 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 46 ි වමින්  .	
SFX 46 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 46 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 46 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 46 ි ේ  .	
SFX 46 ි ෙමි  .	
SFX 46 ි ෙමු  .	
SFX 46 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 46 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 46 0 ෙයි  .	
SFX 46 0 ෙති  .	
SFX 46 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 46 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 46 0 වේ  .	
SFX 46 0 න  .	
SFX 46 ි ිය  .	
SFX 46 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 46 0 නට  .	
SFX 46 0 වා  .	
SFX 46 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 46 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 47 Y 72	
SFX 47 0 ති  .	
SFX 47 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 47 0 නවා  .	
SFX 47 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 47 0 නු  .	
SFX 47 0 න්න  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 47 0 පන්  .	
SFX 47 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 47 0 මි  .	
SFX 47 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 47 0 මු  .	
SFX 47 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 47 0 යි  .	
SFX 47 0 ව  .	
SFX 47 0 වති  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 47 0 වමි  .	
SFX 47 0 වමු  .	
SFX 47 0 වයි  .	
SFX 47 0 වහි  .	
SFX 47 0 වහු  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 47 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 47 0 වු  .	
SFX 47 0 හි  .	
SFX 47 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 47 0 හු  .	
SFX 47 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 47 0 මින්  .	
SFX 47 0 ද  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 47 0 නලද  .	
SFX 47 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 47 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 47 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 47 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 47 ි ්ද  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දෙමි  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දෙමු  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දෙහි  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දෙහු  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දේය  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දාය  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දෝය  .	
SFX 47 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 47 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 47 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 47 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 47 0 වේ  .	
SFX 47 ි ිය  .	
SFX 47 0 න  .	
SFX 47 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දොත්  .	
SFX 47 0 නට  .	
SFX 47 0 වා  .	
SFX 47 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 47 ි ්දුවේ  .	
SFX 47 0 නුයේ  .

SFX 48 Y 72	
SFX 48 0 ති  .	
SFX 48 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 48 0 නවා  .	
SFX 48 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 48 0 නු  .	
SFX 48 0 න්න  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 48 0 පන්  .	
SFX 48 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 48 0 මි  .	
SFX 48 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 48 0 මු  .	
SFX 48 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 48 0 යි  .	
SFX 48 0 ව  .	
SFX 48 0 වති  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 48 0 වමි  .	
SFX 48 0 වමු  .	
SFX 48 0 වයි  .	
SFX 48 0 වහි  .	
SFX 48 0 වහු  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 48 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 48 0 වු  .	
SFX 48 0 හි  .	
SFX 48 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 48 0 හු  .	
SFX 48 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 48 0 මින්  .	
SFX 48 0   .	
SFX 48 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 48 0 නලද  .	
SFX 48 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 48 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 48 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 48 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බ  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බෙමි  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බෙමු  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බෙහි  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බෙහු  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බේය  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බාය .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බෝය .	
SFX 48 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 48 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 48 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 48 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 48 0 වේ  .	
SFX 48 0 ය  .	
SFX 48 0 න  .	
SFX 48 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බොත් .	
SFX 48 0 නට  .	
SFX 48 0 වා  .	
SFX 48 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 48 ඹි ම්බුවේ  .	
SFX 48 0 නුයේ  .	

SFX 50 Y 73	
SFX 50 0 ති  .	
SFX 50 0 ත්වා  .	
SFX 50 0 නවා  .	
SFX 50 0 නවාලා  .	
SFX 50 0 නු  .	
SFX 50 0 න්න  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නීය  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙමි  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙමිවා  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙමු  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙමුවා  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙහි  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෙහිවා  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නේය  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නෝය  .	
SFX 50 0 පන්  .	
SFX 50 0 පල්ලා  .	
SFX 50 0 මි  .	
SFX 50 0 මිවා  .	
SFX 50 0 මු  .	
SFX 50 0 මුවා  .	
SFX 50 0 යි  .	
SFX 50 0 ව  .	
SFX 50 0 වති  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නීය  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නෙමි  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නෙමු  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නෙහි  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නේය  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නෝය  .	
SFX 50 0 වමි  .	
SFX 50 0 වමු  .	
SFX 50 0 වයි  .	
SFX 50 0 වහි  .	
SFX 50 0 වහු  .	
SFX 50 0 වයි  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නට  .	
SFX 50 0 වමින්  .	
SFX 50 0 වු  .	
SFX 50 0 හි  .	
SFX 50 0 හිවා  .	
SFX 50 0 හු  .	
SFX 50 0 හුවා  .	
SFX 50 0 මින්  .	
SFX 50 0 ද  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නට  .	
SFX 50 0 නලද  .	
SFX 50 0 නුලැබූ  .	
SFX 50 0 ද්දී  .	
SFX 50 0 නලදී  .	
SFX 50 ි ුණු  .	
SFX 50 ි ූ  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවෙමි  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවෙමු  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවෙහි  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවෙහු  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවේය  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවාය  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවෝය  .	
SFX 50 ි ෙහි  .	
SFX 50 ි ෙහු  .	
SFX 50 0 වෙයි  .	
SFX 50 0 වෙති  .	
SFX 50 0 වේ  .	
SFX 50 ි ිය  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවොත්  .	
SFX 50 ි ුවේ  .	
SFX 50 0 න්නේ  .	
SFX 50 0 න  .	
SFX 50 0 නට  .	
SFX 50 0 වා  .	
SFX 50 0 වන්නේ  .	
SFX 50 0 නුයේ  .	
