en_US.dic
සපුර/44
හඳුන/44
හඳුන්ව/44
පමුණුව/44
හදාර/44
පුපුර/44
පුළුස්ස/44
කලත්ත/44
නවත්ත/44
පවත්ව/44
උදුර/44
උසුල/44
උසුරුව/44
උගුල්ල/44
අතුර/44
අඳුන/44
අමුණ/44
අවුල/44
අහුර/44
අවුස්ස/44
බස්ස/45
පද්ද/45
නග්ග/45
රක්ක/45
වන්ද/45
බන්ද/45
ගන්න/45
දන්න/45
පන්න/45
මද්ද/45
බද්ද/45
හප්ප/45
වද්ද/45
අස්වද්ද/45
අත්දක්ක/45
පිරිමද්ද/45
පිලිපද්ද/45
ඇවිද්ද/45
නැගිට්ට/45
ඉස්ස/45
අන්ද/45
පලන්ද/45
අයැදි/46
අනි/46
ගනි/46
දනි/46
පිළිපදි/46
අමදි/46,53
ඇවිදි/46
පදි/46
පිරිමදි/46
පිළිපදි/46
බදි/46
මදි/46
නගි/46
නැගිටි/46
පනි/46
බසි/46
නගි/46
පනි/46
රකි/46
දකි/46
අක්දකි/46
අගි/46
අත්දකි/46
අදි/46
අනි/46
අස්වදි/46
ඇවිදි/46
ඉසි/46
ඉහි/46
වඳි/47
බඳි/47
අනුබඳි/47
කල්බඳි/47
මඳි/47
ලුහුබඳි/47
අඳි/47
බිඳි/47
හිඳි/47
සිඳි/47
විඳි/47
හිඳි/47
පිඹි/48
සිඹි/48
මඩි/50
හඟි/50
කාවදි/50
මුදාහරි/50
කිරිවදි/50
සුරකි/50
අරි/50
අඟි/50
අහි/50
